Illinois, session 104th, SB827.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Foster Parent Law is amended by changing 5Section 1-1 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 520/1-1)7    Sec. 1-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the the 8Foster Parent Law.9(Source: P.A. 89-19, eff. 6-3-95.)